Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
REPEAL OF ELDERLY AND DISABLED TRANSPORTATION FUND
SECTION 1. ORS 391.800, 391.802, 391.810, 391.815, 391.820 and 391.830 are repealed.
SECTION 2. No later than July  1, 2023, the Department of Transportation shall transfer
from the Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund  established under ORS 391.800 to
the Statewide Transportation Improvement  Fund established under ORS 184.751 any amounts
remaining in the Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund.
STATEWIDE TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENT FUND
SECTION 3.  ORS 184.751 is amended to read:
184.751. (1) The Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund is established in the  State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Statewide Transportation
Improvement Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated
to the Department of Transportation to finance  investments and improvements [ in] or to maintain
existing public  transportation services, except that the moneys may not be used for light rail capital
expenses but may be used for light rail operation expenses.
(2) The Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund consists of:
(a) All moneys received from the tax imposed under ORS 320.550;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly; and
(c) Other moneys deposited in the fund from any source.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 184.751, as amended  by section 3 of this 2020 special session Act, is amended
to read:
184.751. (1) The Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund is established in the  State Treas-
ury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned  by the Statewide Transportation
Improvement Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund  are continuously appropriated
to the Department of Transportation to finance  investments and improvements or to maintain ex-
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 1
isting public transportation  services, except that the moneys may not be used for light rail capital
expenses but may be used for light rail operation expenses.
(2) The Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund consists of:
(a) All moneys received from the tax imposed under ORS 320.550;
(b) Moneys appropriated or otherwise transferred  to the fund by  the  Legislative Assembly;
[and]
(c) Moneys transferred to the fund under  ORS 184.642, 323.455 or 323.457 (1)(d) and (2)(b);
(d) Distribution repayments, if any; and
[(c)] (e) Other moneys deposited in the fund from any source.
(3) Unless approved by the department, the moneys in the Statewide Transportation  Im-
provement Fund may  not be used to supplant local and regional agency moneys currently
directed to public transportation service providers.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 184.758 is amended to read:
184.758. (1) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall distribute the moneys in  the Statewide
Transportation Improvement Fund established under ORS 184.751 [ as follows: ] to the Department
of Transportation to pay for:
(a) Program administration; and
(b) Projects of statewide significance that support the transit network and manage the
operation of public transportation services.
(2) The moneys described in subsection (1) of this section that remain after the  distrib-
ution of moneys described in subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed as follows:
(a) Conditioned upon the commission’s  approval of a public transportation improvement plan, 90
percent to qualified entities;
(b) Five percent  to public transportation service providers based on a competitive grant program
adopted by the commission by rule;
(c) Four percent  to public transportation service providers to provide funding assistance to
cover the costs of improving public transportation services between two or more communities; and
(d) One percent  to the Department of Transportation [ to pay the department’s administrative costs
and expenses associated with carrying out the provisions of ORS 184.752 to  184.766 and ] to establish
a statewide public transportation technical resource center, the  purpose of which is to assist public
transportation service providers in rural areas with  technical assistance, training, transportation
planning and information technology.
(3) A  portion of the 90 percent distribution under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall
be dedicated to transit services for older adults and  individuals with disabilities. Each
biennium the commission shall first distribute the moneys  transferred to the fund under
ORS 184.751 as needed to maintain funding that  benefits older adults and individuals with
disabilities in the amount distributed  during the 2019-2021 biennium. Each biennium there-
after, the commission shall adjust  this amount upward or downward based on the rate of
growth or  decline of the Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund. Moneys dedicated to
transit services for older adults  and individuals with disabilities under this subsection shall
be distributed as follows:
(a) Each transportation district and mass transit district shall  receive that share of the
moneys as the population of the counties in which the district is  situated, determined under
ORS 190.510 to 190.610 last preceding apportionment  of the moneys, bears to the total popu-
lation of this state. However, if two or  more districts are situated in a single county, dis-
tribution of moneys under this subsection shall be determined as though only the  mass
transit district  is located in that county or, if there are two or more transportation districts
in the county, as though only the transportation district with the highest population is lo-
cated in that county.
(b) Each county in which no part of a mass transit district or transportation district  is
located shall receive that share  of the moneys as its population, determined under ORS
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 2
190.510 to 190.610 last preceding apportionment of the moneys, bears to  the total population
of this state.
(c) Each  federally recognized Indian tribe shall receive that share of the moneys as the
population of the tribe residing in  Oregon, determined by the commission by rule, bears to
the total population of this state.
(4) Each qualified entity  under subsection (3) of this section shall receive an annual tar-
get amount of $67,700. Each biennium, the commission shall adjust this amount upward or
downward based on the rate of growth or decline of the Statewide Transportation  Improve-
ment Fund.
[(2) For purposes of the percentage distributions under subsection (1)(a) of this section: ]
(5) After a portion of  the 90 percent distribution under subsection (2)(a) of this section
is distributed to transit services for older adults and  individuals with disabilities under sub-
section (3) of this section, the commission shall distribute the remaining amount to qualified
entities as follows:
(a) Each distribution must be in such shares that the amount  of tax paid, as required under ORS
320.550, in  the area of each qualified entity bears to the total amount of the tax paid statewide,
provided that each qualified entity receives an  annual  target  amount of [ at least ] $100,000. Each
biennium, the commission shall adjust this  amount upward or downward based on the rate
of growth or decline of the Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund.
(b) If more than one mass transit district  or transportation district is located within a single
county, the commission shall distribute the moneys to the larger district.
[(3)] (6) The commission shall adopt by rule:
(a) A competitive grant program, by which a public  transportation service provider may apply
for a percentage distribution under subsection [ (1)(b)] (2)(b) of this section, and the terms and con-
ditions of grants.
(b) A competitive grant program, by which a public  transportation service provider may apply
for a percentage distribution under subsection [ (1)(c)] (2)(c) of this section,  and the terms and con-
ditions of grants.
(c) A process to review and approve a public transportation improvement plan  submitted under
subsection [ (4)] (7) of this section.
(d) Procedures for appealing a rejection of a  public transportation improvement plan submitted
under subsection [ (4)] (7) of this section.
(e) Any other  provisions or procedures that are necessary for the commission to carry out the
provisions of ORS 184.758 to 184.766.
[(4)] (7) To be eligible to receive a percentage distribution under subsection  [(1)(a)] (2)(a) of this
section, a qualified entity shall prepare and submit  a public transportation improvement plan to the
commission. The commission must approve  the plan submitted by the qualified entity before the
commission may make a percentage distribution to the qualified entity.
[(5)] (8) At a minimum, a public transportation improvement  plan submitted under this section
must include:
(a) For each proposed project, the  amount of moneys from the percentage distribution that
would be allocated to the project to fund the following:
(A) Increased frequency of bus service schedules in communities with a high  percentage of
low-income households;
(B) Procurement of buses that are powered by  natural gas or electricity for use in areas with
a population of 200,000 or more;
(C) Implementation of programs to reduce fares for public transportation in  communities with
a high percentage of low-income households;
(D) Expansion of bus routes and bus services to reach  communities with a high percentage of
low-income  households;
(E) Improvement  in the frequency and reliability of service connections between communities
inside and outside of the qualified entity’s service area;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 3
(F) Coordination between public transportation service providers to reduce fragmentation in the
provision of transportation services; [ and]
(G) Implementation of programs to provide student transit services  for students in grades 9
through 12; and
(H) Services for older adults and people with disabilities;
(b) For the current fiscal year, a  summary of any plans and project proposals approved by an
advisory committee under ORS 184.761; and
(c) If a qualified entity was  a recipient of a percentage distribution in the preceding fiscal year,
the amount of moneys received from the distribution that were allocated to a  project for the pur-
poses described under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(6)] (9) If practicable, as determined by the commission  by rule each qualified entity shall spend
at least one  percent of the amount received each year under subsection [ (1)(a)] (2)(a) of this section
to implement programs to provide student transit services for students in grades 9 through 12.
[(7)] (10) After the commission  makes a distribution under subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section,
qualified entities  may enter into intergovernmental agreements under ORS chapter 190 to combine
the moneys received for public transportation improvements.
[(8)] (11) If the  commission rejects a public transportation improvement plan or a grant appli-
cation submitted under this section, the commission shall notify  the entity or provider in writing
and state the reasons for the rejection.
[(9)] (12) The Department  of Transportation shall make all grant applications submitted under
this section available to the public.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 184.761 is amended to read:
184.761. (1) The governing body of  each qualified entity shall appoint an advisory committee to
advise and assist the governing body in prioritizing plans or projects to be funded from  the moneys
received from a  percentage distribution under ORS 184.758 to public transportation service provid-
ers that provide services within the jurisdiction of the qualified entity.
(2) Before receiving funding for a project under ORS 184.758  (2)(a) , a public transportation
service provider that provides services [ within the jurisdiction of a  qualified entity ] shall submit a
plan or project proposal to the governing body of the qualified  entity and receive the advisory
committee’s approval of the plan  or project proposal. The plans or project proposals submitted under
this subsection must describe how the  funds would be used.  Client-only projects, as defined by the
Oregon Transportation Commission by rule,  may be eligible for consideration if the project
is part of a planned and coordinated community transportation program.
(3) An advisory committee appointed under this section shall review  every plan or project pro-
posal required under subsection (2)  of this section and may propose any changes to the policies or
practices of the governing body relating to the distribution  of funding under ORS 184.758 (2)(a)
and that the advisory committee considers necessary to ensure that:
(a) A public transportation service provider that has received funding  under ORS 184.758  (2)(a)
has applied the moneys received in accordance with and for  the purposes described in the provider’s
plan or project proposal; and
(b) A plan or project proposal  submitted by a public transportation service provider does not
fragment the provision of public transportation services.
(4) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall adopt by rule:
(a) Requirements for the composition of an advisory committee appointed under this section;
(b) Criteria that must be included in a plan or project proposal required  under subsection (2)
of this section; and
(c) A process by which an advisory committee shall review and approve a plan or project  pro-
posal.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this  section, the governing bodies of two or more qualified
entities may appoint advisory committee  members to a joint advisory committee under conditions
determined by the commission by rule.
SECTION 7.
 ORS 184.766 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 4
184.766. (1) Every qualified entity that  receives a percentage distribution under ORS 184.758
shall submit the following to the Department of Transportation:
[(1)] (a)  No later than 60 days after the end of the fiscal year, a report  on any actions taken
by a public transportation service provider located within the area of a qualified entity  to mitigate
the impact of the tax  imposed under ORS 320.550 on passengers who reside in low-income commu-
nities;
[(2)] (b)  No later than 30 days after adoption, the  annual budget for the upcoming fiscal year;
and
[(3)] (c)  No later than 30 days after receipt  of the final results of any audits of the qualified
entity or of a  public transportation service provider located within the area of the qualified entity
as required by a local, state or federal oversight agency for purposes of  statewide reporting, the
final results including, but not limited to:
[(a)] (A)  The state financial report required under ORS 291.040;
[(b)] (B)  The results of any  comprehensive review completed by the Federal Transit Adminis-
tration or the department; [ and]
[(c)] (C)  Any information submitted by the  qualified entity as a part of the requirements of a
statewide audit in accordance with the federal Single Audit Act of 1984  (31 U.S.C. 7501 to 7507), as
amended by the Single Audit Act Amendments of 1996 (P.L. 104-156)[.]; and
(D) Any quarterly reports that detail project  progress, outcomes achieved and the ex-
penditure of funds described under ORS 184.758 (2)(a).
(2) The Oregon Transportation Commission shall establish  rules concerning the making
of agreements for the distributions  made to qualified entities under ORS 184.758. Each
agreement must include a condition that requires a qualified entity to repay, in full, distrib-
utions paid to the qualified entity, if the commission determines that the recipient has failed
meet to any terms or conditions of the agreement.
SECTION 8.
The amendments to ORS 184.766 by section 7 of this 2020 special session Act
apply to distributions made on or after July 1, 2023.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 9.  ORS 184.642 is amended to read:
184.642. (1) The Department of Transportation Operating Fund is  established in the State
Treasury separate and distinct from the General Fund and separate and distinct  from the State
Highway Fund. Except as otherwise provided  in subsection (3)(e) of this section, moneys in the De-
partment of Transportation Operating  Fund are continuously appropriated to the Department of
Transportation to pay expenses of the  department that are incurred in the performance of functions
the department is statutorily required  or authorized to perform and that may not constitutionally
be paid from revenues described in section 3a, Article IX of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) The operating fund shall consist of the following:
(a) Taxes paid on motor vehicle fuels or on the use of  fuel in a motor vehicle for which a person
is entitled to a refund under a provision described in this paragraph  but for which no refund is
claimed, in amounts determined under ORS 184.643. This paragraph applies to  refund entitlements
described in ORS 319.280 (1)(a) and (e), 319.320 (1)(a) and 319.831 (1)(b).
(b) Fees collected under ORS 822.700 for issuance or renewal of:
(A) Dismantler certificates;
(B) Vehicle dealer certificates;
(C) Show licenses;
(D) Vehicle transporter certificates;
(E) Driver training instructor certificates;
(F) Commercial driver training school certificates; and
(G) Vehicle appraiser certificates.
(c) Late fees collected under ORS 822.700.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 5
(d) Fees collected under ORS 822.705.
(e) Moneys from civil penalties imposed under ORS 822.009.
(f) Fees collected under ORS 807.410 for identification cards.
(g) Fees collected by the department for  issuance of permits to engage in activities described in
ORS 374.302 to 374.334 that are  not directly connected to the construction, reconstruction, im-
provement, repair, maintenance, operation and use of a public highway, road, street or roadside  rest
area.
(h) Fees collected under ORS 835.017 for services provided to the Oregon  Department of Avi-
ation.
(i) Interest and other earnings on moneys in the operating fund.
(3) Moneys in the Department of Transportation Operating Fund established by  subsections (1)
and (2) of this section may be spent only as follows:
(a) Taxes described in subsection (2)(a) of this section may be  used only for payment of expenses
of the Department of Transportation that:
(A) May not constitutionally be paid from revenues described in section 3a,  Article IX of the
Oregon Constitution;
(B) Are incurred in the performance of functions  the department is statutorily required or au-
thorized to perform; and
(C) Are not payable from moneys described in paragraphs (b) to (e) of this subsection.
(b) Fees collected under subsection (2)(b) of this section may be used only to  carry out the
regulatory functions of the department relating to the businesses that generate the fees.
(c) Fees collected under ORS  822.705 may be used only for the purposes described in ORS
822.705.
(d) Moneys collected from civil penalties imposed under ORS 822.009 may be  used only for reg-
ulation of vehicle dealers.
(e) Moneys collected under ORS 807.410  from fees for identification cards shall be used first to
pay the expenses of the department for performing  the functions of the department relating to
identification cards. After paying the expenses related to identification cards,  the department shall
transfer the remaining moneys collected under  ORS 807.410 to the [ Elderly and Disabled Special
Transportation Fund established in ORS 391.800 ] Statewide  Transportation Improvement Fund
established in ORS 184.751.
(f) Moneys from the permits described in subsection (2)(g) of this section may  be used for costs
of issuing the permits and monitoring the activities that generate the fees.
(g) Moneys from interest and other earnings on moneys in the operating fund may be used for
any purpose for which other moneys in the fund may be used.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 323.455 is amended to read:
323.455. (1) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue from the tax imposed by ORS
323.030 (1) shall be paid over to the State Treasurer to  be held in a suspense account established
under ORS 293.445. The department may  pay expenses for administration and enforcement of ORS
323.005 to 323.482  out of moneys received from the tax imposed under ORS 323.030 (1). Amounts
necessary to pay administrative and enforcement expenses are continuously appropriated to the  de-
partment from the suspense account. After  the payment of administrative and enforcement expenses
and refunds, 89.65 percent shall be credited to the General Fund, 3.45 percent is appropriated to  the
cities of this state, 3.45 percent is  appropriated to the counties of this state and 3.45 percent is
continuously appropriated to the Department of Transportation for the purpose of financing  and
improving transportation  services for [ elderly individuals ] older adults  and individuals with disa-
bilities [ as provided in ORS 391.800 to 391.830 ].
(2) The moneys appropriated to cities and counties under subsection (1) of  this section shall be
paid on a monthly basis within 35 days after the end of  the month for which a distribution is made.
Each city shall receive such share of the money appropriated to all cities as its population, as  de-
termined under ORS 190.510 to 190.590  last preceding such apportionment, bears to the total popu-
lation of the cities of the state, and each county shall receive such share of the money as  its
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 6
population, determined under ORS 190.510  to 190.590 last preceding such apportionment, bears to
the total population of the state.
(3) The moneys appropriated to the Department of Transportation under subsection (1)  of this
section shall be  distributed and transferred to the [ Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund
established by ORS 391.800 ] Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund established  in ORS
184.751 at the same time as the cigarette tax moneys are distributed to  cities and counties under
this section.
(4) Of the moneys credited to the General Fund under subsection (1) of this section, 51.92  per-
cent shall be dedicated to funding the maintenance and expansion of the  number of persons eligible
for the medical assistance program  under ORS chapter 414, or to funding the maintenance of the
benefits available under the program, or both, and 5.77 percent shall  be credited to the Tobacco Use
Reduction Account established under ORS 431A.153.
(5) All moneys received by the  Department of Revenue from the tax imposed by ORS 323.030 (4)
shall be paid over to the State Treasurer to be held in a suspense account  established under ORS
293.445. After the payment  of refunds, the balance shall be credited to the Oregon Health Authority
Fund established by ORS 413.101 and shall be  used to provide the services described in ORS 430.630.
SECTION 11.  If  chapter 525, Oregon Laws 2019 (IRR 402), is approved by the voters at the
general election held throughout this state on November 3, 2020, ORS 323.455, as amended by sec-
tion 4, chapter 525, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
323.455. (1) All moneys received by the Department of Revenue from the tax imposed by ORS
323.030 (1) shall be paid over to the  State Treasurer to be held in a suspense account established
under ORS 293.445. The department may pay expenses for  administration and enforcement of ORS
323.005 to 323.482 out of moneys received from the  tax imposed under ORS 323.030 (1), after all
amounts available under section 3, chapter 525, Oregon  Laws 2019, for expenses for administration
and enforcement of ORS 323.005 to 323.482 have been used. Amounts necessary to pay administrative
and enforcement expenses are continuously appropriated to the  department from the suspense ac-
count. After the payment of administrative and enforcement expenses and refunds, 89.65 percent
shall be credited to the General Fund, 3.45 percent is appropriated  to the cities of this state, 3.45
percent is appropriated to the counties of  this state and 3.45 percent is continuously appropriated
to the Department of Transportation for the purpose of financing and improving transportation ser-
vices for [ elderly individuals ] older adults  and individuals with disabilities [ as provided in ORS
391.800 to 391.830].
(2) The moneys appropriated to  cities and counties under subsection (1) of this section shall be
paid on a monthly basis within 35 days after the end of  the month for which a distribution is made.
Each city  shall receive such share of the money appropriated to all cities as its population, as de-
termined under ORS 190.510 to 190.590 last preceding such apportionment,  bears to the total popu-
lation of  the cities of the state, and each county shall receive such share of the money as its
population, determined under ORS 190.510 to 190.590 last preceding  such apportionment, bears to
the total population of the state.
(3) The moneys  appropriated to the Department of Transportation under subsection (1) of this
section shall be  distributed and transferred to the [ Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund
established by ORS  391.800] Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund established in ORS
184.751 at the same time  as the cigarette tax moneys are distributed to cities and counties under
this section.
(4) Of  the moneys credited to the General Fund under subsection (1) of this section, 51.92 per-
cent shall be dedicated to funding the maintenance and expansion of the  number of persons eligible
for the medical assistance program under ORS chapter 414, or to funding  the maintenance of the
benefits available under the program, or both, and 5.77 percent shall  be credited to the Tobacco Use
Reduction Account established under ORS 431A.153.
(5) All moneys received by the  Department of Revenue from the tax imposed by ORS 323.030 (4)
shall be paid over  to the State Treasurer to be held in a suspense account established under ORS
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 7
293.445. After the payment  of refunds, the balance shall be credited to the Oregon Health Authority
Fund established by ORS 413.101 and shall be  used to provide the services described in ORS 430.630.
SECTION 12.  ORS 323.457 is amended to read:
323.457. (1) Moneys received under ORS 323.031 shall be paid over to  the State Treasurer to be
held in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445. After the payment of refunds:
(a) 29.37/30 of the moneys shall be credited to the Oregon Health Plan  Fund established under
ORS 414.109;
(b) 0.14/30 of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services for distribution to the cities of this state;
(c) 0.14/30  of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services for distribution to the counties of this state;
(d) 0.14/30 of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Transportation to
be distributed and transferred to the [ Elderly and  Disabled Special Transportation Fund established
under ORS 391.800 ] Statewide Transportation Improvement  Fund established in ORS 184.751 ;
and
(e) 0.21/30 of the moneys  shall be credited to the Tobacco Use Reduction Account established
under ORS 431A.153.
(2)(a) Moneys distributed to cities and counties  under this section shall be distributed to each
city or county using the proportions used for distributions made under ORS 323.455.
(b) Moneys shall be distributed to cities,  counties and the [ Elderly and Disabled Special Trans-
portation Fund ] Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund  at the same time moneys are dis-
tributed to cities, counties and the [ Elderly and Disabled Special  Transportation Fund ] Statewide
Transportation Improvement Fund  under ORS 323.455.
SECTION 13.  If  chapter 525, Oregon Laws 2019 (IRR 402), is approved by the voters at the
general election held throughout this state on November 3, 2020, ORS 323.457, as amended by sec-
tion 5, chapter 525, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
323.457. (1) Moneys received under ORS 323.031 (1) shall  be paid over to the State Treasurer to
be held in a suspense account established under ORS 293.445. After the payment of refunds:
(a) 29.37/30 of the  moneys shall be credited to the Oregon Health Authority Fund established
under ORS 413.101;
(b) 0.14/30 of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services for distribution to the cities of this state;
(c) 0.14/30  of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Department of Adminis-
trative Services for distribution to the counties of this state;
(d) 0.14/30 of the moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of  Transportation to
be distributed and transferred to the [ Elderly and  Disabled Special Transportation Fund established
under ORS 391.800 ] Statewide Transportation Improvement  Fund established in ORS 184.751 ;
and
(e) 0.21/30 of the moneys  shall be credited to the Tobacco Use Reduction Account established
under ORS 431A.153.
(2)(a) Moneys distributed to cities and counties  under this section shall be distributed to each
city or county using the proportions used for distributions made under ORS 323.455.
(b) Moneys shall be distributed to cities,  counties and the [ Elderly and Disabled Special Trans-
portation Fund ] Statewide Transportation Improvement Fund  at the same time moneys are dis-
tributed to cities, counties and the [ Elderly and Disabled Special  Transportation Fund ] Statewide
Transportation Improvement Fund  under ORS 323.455.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 184.675 is amended to read:
184.675. As used in ORS 184.670 to 184.733, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Director” means Director of Transportation.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Transportation.
(3) “Indian tribe” means a federally recognized Indian tribe in  Oregon that has members
residing on a reservation or tribal trust lands in Oregon.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 8
[(3)] (4) “Operating agreement” means an agreement for the operation or maintenance on behalf
of the Department of Transportation of all  or part of a public transportation system, but does not
include agreements by  which the department provides only financial or technical assistance or
transportation facilities or equipment and which do not control  routes, rates or levels of service,
or agreements under which such control is exercised by the  federal government through the de-
partment.
[(4)] (5)  “Public transportation system” means any form of passenger  transportation system,
whether or not for hire, including but not limited to air, rail, other  fixed guideway, bus, jitney, taxi
and dial-a-ride passenger transportation systems within, between and outside  of urban and urbanized
areas, and including related passenger terminal facilities and motor vehicle parking facilities.
[(5)] (6)  “Person” means the United States or any state  or any department or agency of any of
the above, or any nonprofit corporation or entity or any  other individual, corporation or entity, ei-
ther public or private.
[(6) “Bus” means a motor vehicle designed for carrying 15 or  more passengers, exclusive of the
driver, and used for the transportation of persons. ]
(7) “Public transportation entity” includes  a city, county, transportation district, mass transit
district, metropolitan service  district, Indian tribe [ as defined in ORS 391.802 ] or private nonprofit
corporation operating a public transportation system.
SECTION 15.  ORS 293.701 is amended to read:
293.701. As used in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) “Investment funds” means:
(a) Public Employees Retirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660;
(b) Industrial Accident Fund referred to in ORS 656.632;
(c) Consumer and Business Services Fund referred to in ORS 705.145;
(d) Employment Department Special Administrative Fund referred to in ORS 657.822;
(e) Insurance Fund referred to in ORS 278.425;
(f) Funds under the control and administration of the Department of State Lands;
(g) Oregon Student Assistance Fund referred to in ORS 348.570;
(h) Moneys made available to the Commission for the Blind under ORS  346.270 and 346.569 or
rules adopted thereunder;
(i) Forest Development Revenue Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.147 and  State Forestry
General Obligation Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.280;
(j) Oregon War Veterans’ Fund referred to in ORS 407.495;
(k) Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account referred to in ORS 407.515;
(L) World War II Veterans’ Compensation Fund;
(m) World War II Veterans’ Bond Sinking Fund;
(n) Funds  in the hands of the State Treasurer that are not required to meet current demands
and that are  invested in the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728 or in another
commingled investment vehicle;
(o) State funds that  are not subject to the control and administration of officers or bodies spe-
cifically designated by law;
(p) Funds derived from the sale of state bonds;
(q) Social Security Revolving Account referred to in ORS 237.490;
(r) Public University Fund established by ORS 352.450;
(s) Local Government Employer Benefit Trust Fund referred to in ORS 657.513;
[(t) Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund established by ORS 391.800; ]
[(u)] (t)  Education Stability Fund established by ORS 348.696;
[(v)] (u)  Deferred Compensation Fund established under ORS 243.411;
[(w)] (v)  Trust for Cultural Development Account established under ORS 359.405; and
[(x)] (w) The State Library Donation Fund and the Talking Book and Braille Library Endowment
Fund subaccount established under ORS 357.195.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 9
(3) “Investment officer” means the State Treasurer in the capacity as  investment officer for the
council.
SECTION 16.  ORS 293.701, as amended  by section 64, chapter 678, Oregon Laws 2019, is
amended to read:
293.701. As used in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Council” means the Oregon Investment Council.
(2) “Investment funds” means:
(a) Public Employees Retirement Fund referred to in ORS 238.660;
(b) Industrial Accident Fund referred to in ORS 656.632;
(c) Consumer and Business Services Fund referred to in ORS 705.145;
(d) Employment Department Special Administrative Fund referred to in ORS 657.822;
(e) Insurance Fund referred to in ORS 278.425;
(f) Funds under the control and administration of the Department of State Lands;
(g) Oregon Student Assistance Fund referred to in ORS 348.570;
(h) Moneys made available to the Commission for the Blind under ORS  346.270 and 346.569 or
rules adopted thereunder;
(i) Forest Development Revenue Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.147 and  State Forestry
General Obligation Bond Fund referred to in ORS 530.280;
(j) Oregon War Veterans’ Fund referred to in ORS 407.495;
(k) Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sinking Account referred to in ORS 407.515;
(L) World War II Veterans’ Compensation Fund;
(m) World War II Veterans’ Bond Sinking Fund;
(n) Funds  in the hands of the State Treasurer that are not required to meet current demands
and that are  invested in the Oregon Short Term Fund established under ORS 293.728 or in another
commingled investment vehicle;
(o) State funds that  are not subject to the control and administration of officers or bodies spe-
cifically designated by law;
(p) Funds derived from the sale of state bonds;
(q) Social Security Revolving Account referred to in ORS 237.490;
(r) Public University Fund established by ORS 352.450;
(s) Local Government Employer Benefit Trust Fund referred to in ORS 657.513;
[(t) Elderly and Disabled Special Transportation Fund established by ORS 391.800; ]
[(u)] (t)  Education Stability Fund established by ORS 348.696;
[(v)] (u)  Deferred Compensation Fund established under ORS 243.411;
[(w)] (v)  Trust for Cultural Development Account established under ORS 359.405;
[(x)] (w) The State Library Donation Fund and the Talking Book and Braille Library Endowment
Fund subaccount established under ORS 357.195;
[(y)] (x)  Funds in the Unclaimed Property Revolving Fund created in ORS 98.388; and
[(z)] (y)  Funds in the Common School Fund that are available for investment.
(3) “Investment officer” means the State Treasurer in the capacity as  investment officer for the
council.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 541.561 is amended to read:
541.561. (1) The Water Resources Department shall establish a  grant program to pay the quali-
fying costs  of planning studies performed to evaluate the feasibility of developing a water conser-
vation, reuse or storage project, as described in ORS  541.566. A grant under this section may be
made to a local government  as defined in ORS 174.116, [ to an Indian tribe as defined in ORS
391.802] to a federally recognized Indian tribe in Oregon that has  members residing on a
reservation or tribal trust lands in Oregon  or to a person.
(2) In lieu of grants, the department may pay the cost of providing direct services, including but
not limited to technical planning services, for a planning study that  is eligible for a grant under this
section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 10
(3) A grant or the cost of direct services provided under this section may  not exceed $500,000
per project. A grant or payment  for direct services may be provided only if the amount of the grant
or the cost of the direct services is  matched by funding from another source that is not less than
a dollar-for-dollar match of the amount or cost.
(4) Grants and the cost of direct services  provided under this section must be paid for from
moneys available in the Water Conservation, Reuse and Storage Investment Fund.
(5)(a) In evaluating above ground storage projects for awards of grants  or payments for direct
services under this section, the department shall give priority to projects that include  provisions for
using stored water to augment in-stream flows to conserve, maintain and  enhance aquatic life, fish
life or other ecological values.
(b) In evaluating all other  eligible projects, the department shall give priority to projects iden-
tified by the department in a statewide water assessment and  inventory for the award of grants or
provision of payment for direct services under this section.
SECTION 18.  ORS 541.659 is amended to read:
541.659. Loans and grants may be made from the Water  Supply Development Account to persons
as defined in ORS 536.007, [ Indian tribes as defined in ORS  391.802] to a federally recognized In-
dian tribe in  Oregon that has members residing on a reservation or tribal trust lands in
Oregon and nonprofit organizations. If an applicant is required to have a water management and
conservation plan, the plan must be submitted to the Water  Resources Department and receive ap-
proval prior to department acceptance of an application for a loan or grant from the account.
OPERATIVE DATE
SECTION 19. (1) Sections 1 and 2 of this 2020 special session  Act and the amendments
to statutes by sections 4 to 7 and 9 to 18  of this 2020 special session Act become operative
on July 1, 2023.
(2) The Department of  Transportation may take any action before the operative date
specified in subsection (1) of this  section that is necessary to enable the department to ex-
ercise, on  and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of the
duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by  sections 1 and 2 of this 2020
special session Act and the amendments to statutes by sections  4 to 7 and 9 to 18 of this 2020
special session Act.
MORATORIUM ON CERTAIN TRAFFIC OFFENSES
SECTION 20.  Section 21 of this 2020 special  session Act is added to and made a part of
the Oregon Vehicle Code.
SECTION 21. (1) As used in this section, “document or credential” includes but is not
limited to documents or credentials issued or  accepted by the Department of Transportation
such as vehicle registration, registration stickers, driving privileges,  declaration of weight,
disabled person parking permits, trip permits, driver licenses and driver permits.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a police officer may not issue a  citation
for a traffic offense based upon a document or credential that expired or a document  that
was not submitted to the department during the period beginning on March 1,  2020, and
ending on December 31, 2020. This subsection applies to the following offenses:
(a) Unlawful parking in a space reserved for persons with disabilities under ORS 811.615.
This paragraph applies only  to individuals who displayed a disabled person parking permit,
issued by this state or another jurisdiction, at the time of the offense but the permit expired
during the period described in this subsection.
(b) Operating a vehicle without driving privileges under ORS 807.010.
(c) Failure to register a vehicle under ORS 803.300.
(d) Failure to pay the appropriate registration fee under ORS 803.315.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 11
(e) Permitting unlawful operation of an unregistered vehicle under ORS 803.320.
(f) Purchase and use of an  out-of-state registered vehicle by a resident under ORS
803.325.
(g) Failure to surrender out-of-state registration under ORS 803.380.
(h) Failure to submit a declaration of weight under ORS 803.440.
(i) Failure to renew vehicle registration under ORS 803.455.
(j) Improper display of validating stickers under ORS 803.560.
(k) Failure of a person to hold a trip permit when required under ORS 803.600 (10).
(3) If a police officer issues a citation in violation of subsection (2)  of this section, the
court shall dismiss the charge.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 22.
The unit captions used in this 2020 special session  Act are provided only for
the convenience of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2020 special session Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 23. This 2020 special session Act being necessary for  the immediate preserva-
tion of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2020
special session Act takes effect on its passage.
Passed by Senate June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2020
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2020
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1601 (SB 1601-A) Page 12